










 


﻿
























Pettee Investors Inc. Has $1,187,000 Stake in American Express Company (NYSE:AXP) - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for American Express Company
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor American Express Company with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

American Express Company (NYSE:AXP) Shares Bought by State of Wisconsin Investment Board
Cincinnati Specialty Underwriters Insurance CO Has $4,812,000 Stake in Automatic Data Processing (NYSE:ADP)
Pettee Investors Inc. Has $1,187,000 Stake in American Express Company (NYSE:AXP)
Sandy Spring Bank Sells 27,575 Shares of Ford Motor Company (F)
NantHealth Inc (NH) Stake Cut by SG Americas Securities LLC
300,263 Shares in Cobalt International Energy, Inc. (CIE) Acquired by SG Americas Securities LLC
Hunter Associates Investment Management LLC Has $285,000 Stake in TJX Companies, Inc. (The) (TJX)
American International Group Inc. Takes Position in Mplx Lp (MPLX)
Gray Television, Inc. (GTN) Stake Increased by American International Group Inc.
American International Group Inc. Sells 1,780 Shares of City Holding Company (CHCO)
Clorox Company (The) (NYSE:CLX) Expected to Earn FY2017 Earnings of $5.33 Per Share
Cobham plc (COB) Price Target Cut to GBX 130
Jefferies Group LLC Boosts Britvic Plc (BVIC) Price Target to GBX 680
C&C Group PLC (CCR) Earns Sell Rating from Shore Capital
Stifel Nicolaus Lowers Snap Inc. (NYSE:SNAP) to Hold
Iofina plc (LON:IOF) Earns Corporate Rating from FinnCap
Hays plc (LON:HAS) Receives Buy Rating from Liberum Capital
Integrated Device Technology, Inc. (NASDAQ:IDTI) Stock Rating Lowered by Zacks Investment Research
PNC Financial Services Group Inc (PNC) Stake Maintained by JNBA Financial Advisors
Sysco Corporation (SYY) Position Cut by Neuberger Berman Group LLC


 


Pettee Investors Inc. Has $1,187,000 Stake in American Express Company (NYSE:AXP)

Posted by Stefani Robinson on Jul 28th, 2017 // No Comments 

Pettee Investors Inc. held its position in American Express Company (NYSE:AXP) during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the SEC. The institutional investor owned 15,000 shares of the payment services company’s stock at the end of the first quarter. American Express accounts for 1.1% of Pettee Investors Inc.’s holdings, making the stock its 26th largest position. Pettee Investors Inc.’s holdings in American Express were worth $1,187,000 as of its most recent SEC filing. 
Other institutional investors also recently bought and sold shares of the company. Sandhill Capital Partners LLC boosted its stake in American Express by 13.1% in the fourth quarter. Sandhill Capital Partners LLC now owns 7,991 shares of the payment services company’s stock worth $592,000 after buying an additional 923 shares during the period. AMF Pensionsforsakring AB boosted its stake in American Express by 111.1% in the fourth quarter. AMF Pensionsforsakring AB now owns 752,985 shares of the payment services company’s stock worth $55,781,000 after buying an additional 396,267 shares during the period. Guardian Capital LP raised its position in shares of American Express by 50.6% in the fourth quarter. Guardian Capital LP now owns 9,898 shares of the payment services company’s stock worth $733,000 after buying an additional 3,326 shares in the last quarter. Guardian Capital Advisors LP raised its position in shares of American Express by 19.9% in the fourth quarter. Guardian Capital Advisors LP now owns 17,420 shares of the payment services company’s stock worth $1,312,000 after buying an additional 2,895 shares in the last quarter. Finally, Zurich Insurance Group Ltd FI raised its position in shares of American Express by 15.3% in the fourth quarter. Zurich Insurance Group Ltd FI now owns 158,665 shares of the payment services company’s stock worth $11,754,000 after buying an additional 21,111 shares in the last quarter. 82.76% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 


 Get American Express Company alerts:



Shares of American Express Company (AXP) traded down 1.70% during mid-day trading on Thursday, hitting $83.85. 6,119,259 shares of the company traded hands. The stock has a market capitalization of $74.21 billion, a price-to-earnings ratio of 17.20 and a beta of 1.18. The firm has a 50-day moving average of $83.37 and a 200-day moving average of $79.53. American Express Company has a one year low of $59.50 and a one year high of $86.28. 




American Express (NYSE:AXP) last released its earnings results on Wednesday, July 19th. The payment services company reported $1.47 earnings per share for the quarter, topping analysts’ consensus estimates of $1.44 by $0.03. American Express had a return on equity of 21.94% and a net margin of 14.11%. The business had revenue of $8.31 billion for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $8.20 billion. During the same quarter last year, the firm posted $2.10 earnings per share. The business’s revenue was up .9% compared to the same quarter last year. On average, equities analysts predict that American Express Company will post $5.73 earnings per share for the current year. 
The firm also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Thursday, August 10th. Shareholders of record on Friday, July 7th will be paid a $0.32 dividend. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Wednesday, July 5th. This represents a $1.28 dividend on an annualized basis and a yield of 1.53%. American Express’s payout ratio is 26.18%. 
American Express announced that its Board of Directors has authorized a stock repurchase program on Wednesday, June 28th that allows the company to repurchase $4.40 billion in shares. This repurchase authorization allows the payment services company to reacquire up to 5.9% of its shares through open market purchases. Shares repurchase programs are usually an indication that the company’s board believes its shares are undervalued. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY WARNING: “Pettee Investors Inc. Has $1,187,000 Stake in American Express Company (NYSE:AXP)” was reported by BNB Daily and is owned by of BNB Daily. If you are accessing this report on another publication, it was copied illegally and republished in violation of U.S. & international copyright and trademark law. The original version of this report can be read at https://www.baseball-news-blog.com/2017/07/28/pettee-investors-inc-maintains-position-in-american-express-company-nyseaxp-updated-updated.html. 
Several research analysts recently issued reports on the stock. BMO Capital Markets reissued a “hold” rating and issued a $84.00 price target on shares of American Express in a research report on Thursday, June 1st. Instinet raised shares of American Express from a “reduce” rating to a “neutral” rating and increased their price target for the stock from $63.00 to $78.00 in a research report on Thursday, April 27th. Jefferies Group LLC reaffirmed a “hold” rating and set a $75.00 price objective on shares of American Express in a report on Saturday, April 22nd. Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) reaffirmed a “neutral” rating and set a $87.00 price objective on shares of American Express in a report on Thursday, April 20th. Finally, Nomura raised shares of American Express from a “reduce” rating to a “neutral” rating and raised their price objective for the stock from $63.00 to $78.00 in a report on Thursday, April 27th. Four investment analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, fourteen have issued a hold rating and thirteen have given a buy rating to the company’s stock. The stock currently has an average rating of “Hold” and a consensus target price of $84.77.
In related news, Vice Chairman Stephen J. Squeri sold 94,792 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction dated Tuesday, July 25th. The stock was sold at an average price of $85.41, for a total transaction of $8,096,184.72. Following the sale, the insider now owns 261,665 shares of the company’s stock, valued at $22,348,807.65. The sale was disclosed in a filing with the SEC, which is available through the SEC website. Also, insider Douglas E. Buckminster sold 3,000 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction dated Friday, April 28th. The shares were sold at an average price of $79.24, for a total value of $237,720.00. Following the sale, the insider now directly owns 55,486 shares in the company, valued at approximately $4,396,710.64. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. In the last quarter, insiders sold 898,176 shares of company stock worth $76,032,499. Insiders own 0.67% of the company’s stock. 
About American Express
American Express Company, together with its subsidiaries, is a global services company. The Company’s principal products and services are charge and credit card products, and travel-related services, which are offered to consumers and businesses around the world. Its segments include the U.S. Consumer Services (USCS), International Consumer and Network Services (ICNS), Global Commercial Services (GCS) and Global Merchant Services (GMS). 

 
Receive News & Ratings for American Express Company Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for American Express Company and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 


































Pettee Investors Inc in New Canaan, CT 06840 - ChamberofCommerce.com




   =     


        









Sign Up
Sign In
Contact Us


 














Search
 

near
 













Home
» Connecticut
» New Canaan
» Portfolio Management & Investment Services
» Pettee Investors Inc













Pettee Investors Inc


0 Reviews

0.0000 stars - based on 0 reviews
                            





46 Clearview Ln  New Canaan, Connecticut 06840


(203) 966-3199


 



 

Print |
                Save |
                Directions


About
Pettee Investors Inc is located at the address 46 Clearview Ln in New Canaan, Connecticut 06840.  They can be contacted via phone at (203) 966-3199 for pricing, hours and directions.  Pettee Investors Inc has an annual sales volume of 1M – 1,999,999.  .For more information contact Shelia  Pettee, PresidentPettee Investors Inc provides Institutional Services, Financial Services, Financial Management to it's customers.  For maps and directions to Pettee Investors Inc view the map to the right.  For reviews of Pettee Investors Inc see below.









Business Features

PRODUCTS


Rollover Plans
, Short-Term Policies
, Annuities
, Treasury Bonds
, Corporate Bonds
, Mortgages
, Profit Sharing Plans
, Commodities
, Combination Policies
, Futures



SERVICES


Private Banking
, Consultations
, Institutional Services
, Online Services
, Financial Services
, Corporate Services
, Long Term Planning
, Individual Services
, Brokerage Services
, Financial Management



 


Information

CONTACT INFORMATION
Phone: (203) 966-3199
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Employee Size: 5 To 9
Exact Employee Count: 6
Exact Sales Volume: 130000
Location Type: Single Location
Sales Volume: 1M – 1,999,999
CATEGORIES:


Portfolio Management & Investment Services
Finance
Investments & Securities



People Also Viewed


Pettee Investors Inc


Po Box 1650  New Canaan, Connecticut 06840




Jmc Investments Inc Delaw


711 West Rd  New Canaan, Connecticut 06840




Advanced Materials Partners Inc


Po Box 1022  New Canaan, Connecticut 06840




Impala Asset Management LLC


134 Main st Ste 1 Ste 2 New Canaan, Connecticut 06840




HTG INVESTMENT ADVISORS INC


50 Locust Ave Ste 7  New Canaan, Connecticut 06840




Fairfield Research Corporation


65 Locust Ave 200A Ste New Canaan, Connecticut 06840





Reviews

Add


You must Sign in to post reviews.





by  on 






Click here to be the first to review this business...



0 Reviews
 


Key Contacts




Shelia  Pettee
President

 



 























 






Site Map
FAQ
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
About
Partners
Chamber Partner Program
Chamber Member Benefits




Top Cities:
Atlanta
Bronx
Brooklyn
Chicago
Cleveland
Dallas
Denver
Detroit
Houston
Las Vegas
Los Angeles
Miami
Minneapolis
New York
Philadelphia
Phoenix
Saint Louis
San Antonio
San Diego
San Jose


© 2017 CHAMBEROFCOMMERCE.COM












Pettee Investors Inc: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback
























pettee investors inc
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Asset Management
Sub-Industry: Wealth Management
Pettee Investors, Inc. provides investment advisory services. The Company offers portfolio and investment management, financial planning, and consulting services. Pettee Investors serves individuals, trusts, estates, foundations, and institutional clients.




Corporate Information
Address:

137 Rowayton Avenue
Suite 300
Rowayton, CT 06853
United States


Phone:
1-203-957-8880


Fax:
1-203-957-8887


Web url:
www.petteeinvestors.com























From The Web











Key Executives


Sheila Peck Pettee


Pres/Chief Compliance Ofcr







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data





















































Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage Very Likely to Impact HealthSouth Corp (HLS) Share Price - BNB Daily












 
















 

 

Home » Investing



Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage Very Likely to Impact HealthSouth Corp (HLS) Share Price

Posted by Stefani Robinson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News coverage about HealthSouth Corp (NYSE:HLS) has trended somewhat positive this week, Accern Sentiment Analysis reports. The research group scores the sentiment of news coverage by reviewing more than twenty million news and blog...  




Foster Wheeler AG (NASDAQ:FWLT) Given Daily Media Impact Score of 0.27

Posted by Tim Parker on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Press coverage about Foster Wheeler AG (NASDAQ:FWLT) has trended positive this week, Accern Sentiment reports. Accern identifies negative and positive media coverage by analyzing more than 20 million blog and news sources in real-time....  




Federal Signal Corporation (NYSE:FSS) Receiving Favorable Press Coverage, Report Finds

Posted by Toi Williams on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Media coverage about Federal Signal Corporation (NYSE:FSS) has been trending positive this week, Accern reports. The research group identifies negative and positive news coverage by analyzing more than twenty million news and blog...  




Ford Motor (F) Getting Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage, Study Shows

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Media headlines about Ford Motor (NYSE:F) have been trending somewhat positive on Thursday, according to Accern Sentiment. The research group scores the sentiment of media coverage by monitoring more than 20 million news and blog sources...  




Gentex Corporation (NASDAQ:GNTX) Receives Media Impact Score of 0.14

Posted by Toi Williams on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News headlines about Gentex Corporation (NASDAQ:GNTX) have trended somewhat positive this week, Accern Sentiment reports. The research firm identifies positive and negative media coverage by reviewing more than 20 million blog and...  




Genesis Energy, L.P. (GEL) Given Daily Coverage Optimism Score of 0.07

Posted by Stefani Robinson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Media coverage about Genesis Energy, L.P. (NYSE:GEL) has been trending somewhat positive this week, Accern reports. The research group identifies negative and positive news coverage by analyzing more than twenty million news and blog...  




Favorable News Coverage Likely to Impact GlaxoSmithKline PLC (NYSE:GSK) Share Price

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News coverage about GlaxoSmithKline PLC (NYSE:GSK) has been trending positive on Thursday, Accern Sentiment reports. Accern ranks the sentiment of news coverage by analyzing more than 20 million news and blog sources. Accern ranks...  




Newmont Mining Corporation (NEM) Upgraded to “Outperform” at Scotiabank

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Newmont Mining Corporation (NYSE:NEM) was upgraded by stock analysts at Scotiabank from a “sector perform” rating to an “outperform” rating in a report released on Wednesday, July 5th. The brokerage presently...  




Kohl’s Corporation (KSS) Upgraded by BidaskClub to Hold

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Kohl’s Corporation (NYSE:KSS) was upgraded by stock analysts at BidaskClub from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a note issued to investors on Wednesday, July 5th.
A number of other brokerages have...  




Marathon Oil Corporation (NYSE:MRO) Upgraded to “Buy” by Citigroup Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Citigroup Inc. upgraded shares of Marathon Oil Corporation (NYSE:MRO) from a neutral rating to a buy rating in a research note released on Wednesday, July 5th, MarketBeat.com reports. The brokerage currently has $15.00 price objective...  




AG Mortgage Investment Trust, Inc. (NYSE:MITT) Stock Rating Lowered by Zacks Investment Research

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

AG Mortgage Investment Trust, Inc. (NYSE:MITT) was downgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a report issued on Wednesday, July 5th.
According to Zacks, “AG Mortgage...  




Archer-Daniels-Midland Company (ADM) Receives “Hold” Rating from BMO Capital Markets

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Archer-Daniels-Midland Company (NYSE:ADM)‘s stock had its “hold” rating reiterated by analysts at BMO Capital Markets in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, June 27th. They currently have a $41.00 price objective...  




Zacks Investment Research Lowers Guidance Software, Inc. (NASDAQ:GUID) to Hold

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Guidance Software, Inc. (NASDAQ:GUID) was downgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, July 4th.
According to Zacks, “GUIDANCE...  




Black Box Corporation (BBOX) Rating Increased to Buy at Sidoti

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Sidoti upgraded shares of Black Box Corporation (NASDAQ:BBOX) from a neutral rating to a buy rating in a research note published on Tuesday, June 27th, MarketBeat Ratings reports. Sidoti currently has $10.00 price objective on the...  




Mizuho Lowers Jazz Pharmaceuticals PLC (NASDAQ:JAZZ) to Neutral

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Mizuho downgraded shares of Jazz Pharmaceuticals PLC (NASDAQ:JAZZ) from a buy rating to a neutral rating in a research note published on Tuesday, July 4th, StockTargetPrices.com reports. Mizuho currently has $150.00 price objective...  




Harmonic Inc. (NASDAQ:HLIT) Upgraded to “Hold” by Zacks Investment Research

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Harmonic Inc. (NASDAQ:HLIT) was upgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “strong sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, July 4th.
According to Zacks, “Harmonic designs,...  




Alphabet Inc. (GOOGL) Receives “Buy” Rating from Cantor Fitzgerald

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Cantor Fitzgerald restated their buy rating on shares of Alphabet Inc. (NASDAQ:GOOGL) in a research note published on Tuesday, June 27th, Marketbeat Ratings reports. Cantor Fitzgerald currently has a $1,070.00 price objective on the...  




Sysco Corporation’s (SYY) “Buy” Rating Reiterated at BMO Capital Markets

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Sysco Corporation (NYSE:SYY)‘s stock had its “buy” rating reiterated by analysts at BMO Capital Markets in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, June 27th, MarketBeat Ratings reports. They currently have a $60.00...  




Somewhat Positive Media Coverage Very Likely to Impact Praxair (PX) Share Price

Posted by Stefani Robinson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News coverage about Praxair (NYSE:PX) has trended somewhat positive on Thursday, according to Accern Sentiment. Accern identifies negative and positive press coverage by analyzing more than 20 million blog and news sources in real-time....  




LyondellBasell Industries NV (LYB) Given Consensus Rating of “Hold” by Analysts

Posted by Toi Williams on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Shares of LyondellBasell Industries NV (NYSE:LYB) have received an average recommendation of “Hold” from the twenty-one research firms that are currently covering the firm, Marketbeat Ratings reports. One research analyst...  




Fomento Economico Mexicano S.A.B. de C.V. (NYSE:FMX) Given Consensus Rating of “Buy” by Brokerages

Posted by Renee Johnson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Fomento Economico Mexicano S.A.B. de C.V. (NYSE:FMX) has been assigned a consensus recommendation of “Buy” from the seven ratings firms that are covering the company, MarketBeat reports. One analyst has rated the stock...  




Rice Energy Inc. (RICE) Rating Lowered to Hold at KLR Group

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

KLR Group lowered shares of Rice Energy Inc. (NYSE:RICE) from a buy rating to a hold rating in a research report report published on Tuesday, June 27th, MarketBeat reports. They currently have $27.00 price target on the oil and gas...  




$0.39 Earnings Per Share Expected for Axalta Coating Systems Ltd (NASDAQ:AXTA) This Quarter

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Wall Street brokerages forecast that Axalta Coating Systems Ltd (NASDAQ:AXTA) will announce earnings per share of $0.39 for the current quarter, according to Zacks Investment Research. Four analysts have provided estimates for Axalta...  




Eagle Materials Inc (EXP) Expected to Post Earnings of $1.17 Per Share

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Equities analysts expect Eagle Materials Inc (NYSE:EXP) to report earnings of $1.17 per share for the current fiscal quarter, Zacks Investment Research reports. Two analysts have provided estimates for Eagle Materials’ earnings,...  




Marathon Patent Group (NASDAQ:MARA) and Advanced Disposal Services (ADSW) Head to Head Analysis

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Marathon Patent Group (NASDAQ: MARA) and Advanced Disposal Services (NASDAQ:ADSW) are both finance companies, but which is the superior investment? We will contrast the two companies based on the strength of their earnings, dividends,...  




Levin Capital Strategies L.P. Sells 669,521 Shares of Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc (TMO)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Levin Capital Strategies L.P. cut its position in Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc (NYSE:TMO) by 91.5% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 62,473...  




Phillips 66 (PSX) Shares Sold by South State Corp

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

South State Corp cut its position in Phillips 66 (NYSE:PSX) by 19.7% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 49,006 shares of the oil and gas company’s...  




Mirae Asset Global Investments Co. Ltd. Sells 7,102 Shares of Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) (GS)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Mirae Asset Global Investments Co. Ltd. decreased its position in shares of Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) (NYSE:GS) by 19.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the SEC. The institutional...  




General Mills, Inc. (GIS) Stake Increased by Blue Chip Partners Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Blue Chip Partners Inc. raised its position in General Mills, Inc. (NYSE:GIS) by 3.6% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The fund owned 16,110 shares...  




Caterpillar, Inc. (CAT) Position Maintained by Pettee Investors Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Pettee Investors Inc. continued to hold its position in shares of Caterpillar, Inc. (NYSE:CAT) during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 2,332 shares...  




Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC Has $3.25 Million Stake in Imperial Oil Ltd (IMO)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC increased its position in shares of Imperial Oil Ltd (NYSEMKT:IMO) (TSE:IMO) by 4.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission...  




Citigroup Inc. (C) Stake Decreased by NEXT Financial Group Inc

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

NEXT Financial Group Inc reduced its position in shares of Citigroup Inc. (NYSE:C) by 31.0% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the SEC. The institutional investor owned 14,080 shares of the financial...  




Essex Financial Services Inc. Has $261,000 Position in FedEx Corporation (FDX)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Essex Financial Services Inc. increased its stake in FedEx Corporation (NYSE:FDX) by 14.8% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the SEC. The fund owned 1,335 shares of the shipping service provider’s...  




Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC Has $3.28 Million Stake in W.R. Grace & Co. (GRA)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC raised its stake in shares of W.R. Grace & Co. (NYSE:GRA) by 30.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC)....  




Omnia Family Wealth LLC Maintains Position in Medtronic PLC (MDT)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Omnia Family Wealth LLC continued to hold its stake in shares of Medtronic PLC (NYSE:MDT) during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 3,836 shares of...  




Eagle Asset Management Inc. Cuts Position in Medtronic PLC (MDT)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Eagle Asset Management Inc. lowered its stake in shares of Medtronic PLC (NYSE:MDT) by 11.6% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned...  




Warren Averett Asset Management LLC Takes Position in Duke Energy Corporation (DUK)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Warren Averett Asset Management LLC bought a new stake in shares of Duke Energy Corporation (NYSE:DUK) during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The institutional...  




Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC Has $3.33 Million Stake in BancorpSouth, Inc. (BXS)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC raised its stake in shares of BancorpSouth, Inc. (NYSE:BXS) by 4.3% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The...  




HubSpot, Inc. (HUBS) Shares Bought by Ameriprise Financial Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ameriprise Financial Inc. increased its position in shares of HubSpot, Inc. (NYSE:HUBS) by 1.7% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 75,500...  




Kulicke and Soffa Industries, Inc. (KLIC) Earns “Buy” Rating from B. Riley

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

B. Riley reaffirmed their buy rating on shares of Kulicke and Soffa Industries, Inc. (NASDAQ:KLIC) in a report released on Thursday, June 29th. B. Riley currently has a $31.00 price target on the semiconductor company’s stock.
A...  




VCA Inc. (WOOF) Lifted to Hold at Zacks Investment Research

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

VCA Inc. (NASDAQ:WOOF) was upgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a report issued on Thursday, June 29th.
According to Zacks, “VCA Inc. is a national animal healthcare...  




Cray Inc (CRAY) Shares Bought by Ameriprise Financial Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ameriprise Financial Inc. raised its position in shares of Cray Inc (NASDAQ:CRAY) by 4.8% during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The fund owned 212,960...  




149,273 Shares in Premier, Inc. (PINC) Acquired by Ameriprise Financial Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ameriprise Financial Inc. acquired a new position in Premier, Inc. (NASDAQ:PINC) during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The fund acquired 149,273 shares of the...  




Cypress Semiconductor Corporation (CY) Raised to “Buy” at Zacks Investment Research

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Cypress Semiconductor Corporation (NASDAQ:CY) was upgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating in a report issued on Thursday, June 29th. The brokerage presently has a $15.00...  




Intertek Group plc (ITRK) Downgraded to Neutral at Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Intertek Group plc (LON:ITRK) was downgraded by research analysts at Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) to a “neutral” rating in a note issued to investors on Monday, July 3rd, Marketbeat reports. They currently have a GBX...  




Beaufort Securities Downgrades Fox Marble Holdings PLC (FOX) to Hold

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Beaufort Securities downgraded shares of Fox Marble Holdings PLC (LON:FOX) to a hold rating in a research report sent to investors on Monday, July 3rd.
Shares of Fox Marble Holdings PLC (LON:FOX) traded up 0.000% on Monday, hitting...  




VASCO Data Security International, Inc. (VDSI) Lowered to Hold at Zacks Investment Research

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

VASCO Data Security International, Inc. (NASDAQ:VDSI) was downgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report issued to clients and investors on Thursday, June...  




General Mills, Inc. (GIS) Earns “Equal Weight” Rating from Morgan Stanley

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Morgan Stanley restated their equal weight rating on shares of General Mills, Inc. (NYSE:GIS) in a research report sent to investors on Sunday, June 25th. Morgan Stanley currently has a $55.00 price target on the stock, down from...  




Ball Co. (NYSE:BLL) Rating Reiterated by Jefferies Group LLC

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ball Co. (NYSE:BLL)‘s stock had its “buy” rating restated by analysts at Jefferies Group LLC in a research note issued to investors on Sunday, June 25th. They presently have a $47.00 price objective on the industrial...  




$7.06 Billion in Sales Expected for Philip Morris International Inc (PM) This Quarter

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Brokerages expect Philip Morris International Inc (NYSE:PM) to post $7.06 billion in sales for the current fiscal quarter, Zacks Investment Research reports. Two analysts have provided estimates for Philip Morris International’s...  


Next » 














Free Email Newsletter
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor your stocks with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Thermo Fisher Scientific (TMO) Receiving Somewhat Favorable News Coverage, Analysis Shows
Teva Pharmaceutical Industries Limited (TEVA) Receives Daily Media Sentiment Rating of 0.41
PNC Financial Services Group, Inc. (The) (PNC) Position Raised by Delta Lloyd NV
Rogers Corporation (ROG) Position Cut by Prudential Financial Inc.
TJX Companies, Inc. (The) (TJX) Shares Bought by Mason Street Advisors LLC
Becton, Dickinson and Company (BDX) Position Raised by Wealthsource Partners LLC
Nordea Investment Management AB Sells 889,163 Shares of Stryker Corporation (SYK)
Orbotech Ltd. (ORBK) Shares Bought by Envestnet Asset Management Inc.
Envestnet Asset Management Inc. Sells 11 Shares of Cubic Corporation (CUB)
Envestnet Asset Management Inc. Acquires 2,349 Shares of Vipshop Holdings Limited (VIPS)
Premier Asset Managment LLC Has $369,000 Position in Accenture PLC (ACN)
Allergan PLC. (AGN) Shares Sold by Mayo Investment Advisers LLC
Select Medical Holdings Corporation (SEM) Shares Bought by JPMorgan Chase & Co.
Bemis Company, Inc. (BMS) Shares Sold by JPMorgan Chase & Co.
Prudential Financial Inc. Acquires 72 Shares of ESCO Technologies Inc. (ESE)
Prudential Financial Inc. Sells 1,732 Shares of Woodward, Inc. (WWD)
JPMorgan Chase & Co. Acquires 249,725 Shares of Enbridge Energy Management LLC (EEQ)
USS Investment Management Ltd Has $22,858,000 Position in General Dynamics Corporation (GD)
Acceleron Pharma Inc. (XLRN) SVP Sells $29,984.00 in Stock
GTT Communications, Inc. (NYSE:GTT) Expected to Post Earnings of -$0.03 Per Share


 





















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Pettee Investors, Inc.








































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Pettee Investors Inc                                                                                                     - New Canaan                                        , CT         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



CT



New Canaan



Investment Advice



Investment Advisory Service



                            Pettee Investors Inc
                                    



 





















P 


Pettee Investors Inc                                                                                                    
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



46 CLEARVIEW LN NEW CANAAN, CT 06840
Get Directions



(203) 966-3199
 





Business Info



 Founded 1989
 Incorporated CT
 Annual Revenue $156,048.00
 Employee Count 1
 Industries Investment Advisory Service
 Contacts Shelia Pettee                                                                                                           







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Since 1989, Pettee Investors Inc                                                                                                     has been providing Investment Advisory Service from New Canaan. Pettee Investors Inc                                                                                                     is incorporated in Connecticut. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







P

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON) Stock Price, News & Analysis






















    























































































Monsanto Company Company Profile (NYSE:MON)



  






Company Profile



Analyst Ratings



Earnings History



Earnings Estimates



Dividend History



Insider Trade



Headlines



Social Media



Chart






About Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON)
Monsanto Company (Monsanto), along with its subsidiaries, is a provider of agricultural products for farmers. The Company provides seeds, biotechnology trait products, herbicides and digital agriculture tools to farmers. The Company operates through two segments: Seeds and Genomics, and Agricultural Productivity. Through its Seeds and Genomics segment, the Company produces seed brands, including DEKALB, Asgrow, Deltapine, Seminis and De Ruiter, and it develops biotechnology traits that assist farmers in controlling insects and weeds and digital agriculture to assist farmers in decision-making. The Seeds and Genomics segment offers products, such as Germplasm and Biotechnology traits. Through its Agricultural Productivity segment, the Company manufactures Roundup brand herbicides and other herbicides and provides lawn-and-garden herbicide products for the residential market. 


Industry, Sector and Symbol:

Sector: Basic Materials
Industry: Agricultural Chemicals - NEC
Sub-Industry: Fertilizers & Agricultural Chemicals
Symbol: NYSE:MON
CUSIP: 61166W10
Web: www.monsanto.com

Capitalization:Market Cap: $51.53259 billionOutstanding Shares: 439,323,000Average Prices:50 Day Moving Avg: $117.57200 Day Moving Avg: $114.4152 Week Range: $97.35 - $118.97


P/E:Trailing P/E Ratio: 25.38Foreward P/E Ratio: 21.68P/E Growth: 3.00Sales & Book Value:Annual Revenue: $14.52 billionPrice / Sales: 3.56Book Value: $14.87 per sharePrice / Book: 7.90Dividend:Annual Dividend: $2.16Dividend Yield: 1.8%


Profitability:EBIDTA: $4.19 billionNet Margins: 14.11%Return on Equity: 45.26%Return on Assets: 11.37%Debt:Debt-to-Equity Ratio: 1.11%Current Ratio: 1.44%Quick Ratio: 0.98%Misc:Average Volume: 1.73 million shs.Beta: 1.08Short Ratio: 1.66

 

Frequently Asked Questions for Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON)
What is Monsanto Company's stock symbol?

Monsanto Company trades on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE) under the ticker symbol "MON."



How often does Monsanto Company pay dividends? What is the dividend yield for Monsanto Company?

Monsanto Company announced a quarterly dividend on Tuesday, June 6th. Investors of record on Friday, July 7th will be paid a dividend of $0.54 per share on Friday, July 28th. This represents a $2.16 annualized dividend and a yield of 1.84%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Wednesday, July 5th.  View Monsanto Company's Dividend History.



How were Monsanto Company's earnings last quarter?

Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON) issued its earnings results on Wednesday, June, 28th. The company reported $1.93 EPS for the quarter, beating the consensus estimate of $1.74 by $0.19. The company earned $4.23 billion during the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $4.18 billion. Monsanto Company had a return on equity of 45.26% and a net margin of 14.11%. Monsanto Company's revenue was up 1.0% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same period last year, the firm earned $2.17 EPS.  View Monsanto Company's Earnings History.



When will Monsanto Company make its next earnings announcement?

Monsanto Company is scheduled to release their next quarterly earnings announcement on Wednesday, October, 4th 2017. View Earnings Estimates for Monsanto Company.



Where is Monsanto Company's stock going? Where will Monsanto Company's stock price be in 2017?

15 analysts have issued 12-month price objectives for Monsanto Company's stock. Their forecasts range from $104.00 to $128.00. On average, they anticipate Monsanto Company's share price to reach $123.62 in the next year. View Analyst Ratings for Monsanto Company.



Who are some of Monsanto Company's key competitors?

 Some companies that are related to Monsanto Company include Syngenta AG (SYT), Potash Corporation of Saskatchewan (POT), Agrium (AGU), Sociedad Quimica y Minera S.A. (SQM), Scotts Miracle-Gro Company (The) (SMG), Compass Minerals International (CMP), Sirius Minerals PLC (SXX), Ciner Resources LP (CINR), American Vanguard Corporation (AVD), Intrepid Potash (IPI) and Marrone Bio Innovations (MBII).



Who are Monsanto Company's key executives?

Monsanto Company's management team includes the folowing people: Hugh Grant, Chairman of the Board, Chief Executive OfficerBrett D. Begemann, President, Chief Operating OfficerPierre C. Courduroux, Chief Financial Officer, Senior Vice PresidentSteven C. Mizell, Chief Human Resource Officer, Executive Vice PresidentRobert T. Fraley Ph.D., Executive Vice President, Chief Technology OfficerDavid F. Snively J.D., Executive Vice President, General Counsel, SecretaryKerry J. Preete, Executive Vice President and Chief Strategy OfficerMichael J. Frank, Senior Vice President, Chief Commercial OfficerJanet M. Holloway, Senior Vice President, Chief of Staff and Community RelationsNicole M. Ringenberg, Vice President, Controller



Who owns Monsanto Company stock?

Monsanto Company's stock is owned by a number of of retail and institutional investors. Top institutional shareholders include Flossbach Von Storch AG (1.00%), Independent Franchise Partners LLP (0.94%), Manning & Napier Advisors LLC (0.49%), Bank of Montreal Can (0.17%), APG Asset Management N.V. (0.15%) and Factory Mutual Insurance Co. (0.12%). Company insiders that own Monsanto Company stock include Brett D Begemann, Charles S Mcmillan, George Poste, Hugh Grant, Janet M Holloway, Kerry J Preete, Michael J Frank, Michael K Stern, Robert T Fraley, Steven Mizell and William U Parfet. View Institutional Ownership Trends for Monsanto Company.



Who sold Monsanto Company stock? Who is selling Monsanto Company stock?

Monsanto Company's stock was sold by a variety of institutional investors in the last quarter, including Manning & Napier Advisors LLC, Trinity Street Asset Management LLP, Johnston Asset Management LLC, Russell Investments Group Ltd., US Bancorp DE, Exxonmobil Investment Management Inc. TX, Private Wealth Partners LLC and Bank of The West. Company insiders that have sold Monsanto Company stock in the last year include Brett D Begemann, Hugh Grant, Janet M Holloway, Kerry J Preete, Michael K Stern, Robert T Fraley and Steven Mizell. View Insider Buying and Selling for Monsanto Company.



Who bought Monsanto Company stock? Who is buying Monsanto Company stock?

Monsanto Company's stock was bought by a variety of institutional investors in the last quarter, including Flossbach Von Storch AG, Cheyne Capital Management UK LLP, Exane Asset Management, Marathon Asset Management LLP, Boussard & Gavaudan Investment Management LLP, State Treasurer State of Michigan, Strs Ohio and Great West Life Assurance Co. Can.  View Insider Buying and Selling for Monsanto Company.



How do I buy Monsanto Company stock? 

Shares of Monsanto Company can be purchased through any online brokerage account. Popular online brokerages include Vanguard Brokerage Services, TD Ameritrade, E*TRADE, Scottrade, Fidelity and Charles Schwab. 



What is Monsanto Company's stock price today?

One share of Monsanto Company stock can currently be purchased for approximately $117.50.


MarketBeat Community Rating for Monsanto Company (NYSE MON)Community Ranking:  3.0 out of 5 (  )Outperform Votes:  673 (Vote Outperform)Underperform Votes:  433 (Vote Underperform)Total Votes:  1,106MarketBeat's community ratings are surveys of what our community members think about Monsanto Company and other stocks. Vote "Outperform" if you believe the stock will outperform the S&P 500 over the long term. Vote "Underperform" if you believe the stock will underperform the S&P 500 over the long term. You may vote once every thirty days.


Analyst Ratings
Consensus Ratings for Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON) (How are Consensus Ratings Calculated?) MarketBeat calculates consensus ratings using the most recent rating from each brokerage that has rated a stock within the last twelve months. Since brokers often use different ratings systems, each rating is normalized to a standardized rating score of 1 (sell), 2 (hold), 3 (buy) or 4 (strong buy). Consensus ratings scores are calculated using the mean average of the number of normalized sell, hold, buy and strong buy ratings. Each stock's consensus rating is derived from its calculated consensus ratings score (0-1.5 = Sell, 1.5-2.5 = Hold, 2.5-3.5 = Buy, >3.5 = Strong Buy). MarketBeat's consensus price targets are a mean average of the most recent available price targets set by each analyst that has set a price target for the stock in the last twelve months.MarketBeat will no longer include ratings and price target data in its consensus calculation if a broker drops coverage and MarketBeat has received a report that coverage was dropped. Ratings from certain research firms that issue ratings using purely quantitative methods (such as Zacks, Vetr and ValuEngine) are not included in consensus calculations. MarketBeat's consensus ratings and consensus price targets may differ from those calculated by other firms due to differences in methodology and available data.Ratings Breakdown: 7 Hold Ratings, 8 Buy RatingsConsensus Rating:Buy (Score: 2.53)Consensus Price Target: $123.62 (5.20% upside)

Analysts' Ratings History for Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON)

Show:  
Only the Most Recent Rating From Each Brokerage
All Ratings For This Stock


DateFirmActionRatingPrice TargetImpact on Share PriceDetails7/12/2017Jefferies Group LLCDowngradeBuy -> Hold$128.00Low7/10/2017Citigroup Inc.Reiterated RatingNeutral$125.00 -> $126.00Low6/29/2017Barclays PLCBoost Price TargetEqual Weight$115.00 -> $120.00Low6/29/2017Royal Bank Of CanadaReiterated RatingSector Perform -> Sector Perform$120.00 -> $128.00Low6/27/2017Susquehanna Bancshares IncReiterated RatingPositive -> Neutral$125.00 -> $128.00Low4/5/2017BMO Capital MarketsReiterated RatingBuy$128.00Low1/6/2017CLSAUpgradeUnderperform -> OutperformN/A1/5/2017Sanford C. BernsteinSet Price TargetNeutral$105.00N/A11/18/2016OTR GlobalUpgradeNegative -> MixedN/A10/9/2016ArgusReiterated RatingBuy$128.00N/A10/6/2016J P Morgan Chase & CoSet Price TargetBuy$128.00N/A10/6/2016Deutsche Bank AGReiterated RatingBuyN/A10/3/2016Monness Crespi & HardtLower Price TargetBuy$130.00 -> $128.00N/A9/27/2016Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The)UpgradeSell -> Neutral$104.00N/A9/15/2016Piper Jaffray CompaniesSet Price TargetBuy$128.00N/A9/15/2016S&P Equity ResearchReiterated RatingPositiveN/A5/27/2016Atlantic SecuritiesDowngradeOverweight -> Neutral$109.62 -> $105.00N/A5/25/2016MacquarieSet Price TargetBuy$110.00N/A5/24/2016Wells Fargo & CompanyReiterated RatingHoldN/A5/23/2016Vertical ResearchUpgradeHold -> BuyN/A5/13/2016Berenberg BankSet Price TargetBuy$110.00N/A4/9/2016Morgan StanleyReiterated RatingBuyN/A4/7/2016Bank of America CorporationReiterated RatingSell$88.00N/A3/3/2016Vertical GroupDowngradeBuy -> HoldN/A3/2/2016Credit Suisse GroupLower Price TargetOutperform$109.00 -> $97.00N/A10/9/2015Stifel NicolausLower Price TargetBuy$135.00 -> $115.00N/A8/24/2015Canaccord GenuityReiterated RatingBuy$134.00 -> $126.00N/A(Data available from 7/28/2015 forward)


Earnings
Earnings History for Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON)Earnings History by Quarter for Monsanto Company (NYSE MON)DateQuarterConsensus EstimateActual EPSRevenue EstimateActual RevenueRelease LinkConference CallDetails10/4/2017($0.41)N/A6/28/2017Q3 17$1.74$1.93$4.18 billion$4.23 billionViewN/A4/5/2017Q2 2017$2.79$3.19$4.73 billion$5.07 billionViewListen1/5/2017Q117$0.01$0.21$2.22 billionViewListen10/5/2016Q416($0.02)$0.07$2.38 billion$2.56 billionViewListen6/29/2016Q316$2.40$2.17$4.49 billion$4.19 billionViewListen4/6/2016Q216$2.44$2.42$4.81 billion$4.53 billionViewN/A1/6/2016Q116($0.22)($0.11)$2.41 billion$2.22 billionViewListen10/7/2015Q415($0.02)($0.19)$2.79 billion$2.36 billionViewListen6/24/2015Q315$2.06$2.39$4.65 billion$4.58 billionViewListen4/1/2015Q215$2.93$2.90$5.58 billion$5.20 billionViewListen1/7/2015Q115$0.35$0.47$2.80 billion$2.87 billionViewListen10/8/2014Q414($0.24)($0.27)$2.41 billion$2.63 billionViewListen6/25/2014Q314$1.55$1.62$4.41 billion$4.25 billionViewListen4/2/2014Q214$3.08$3.15$5.81 billion$5.83 billionViewListen1/8/2014Q1$0.64$0.67$3.08 billion$3.15 billionViewListen10/2/2013Q413($0.43)($0.47)$2.24 billion$2.20 billionViewListen6/26/2013Q3 2013$1.59$1.66$4.41 billion$4.25 billionViewListen4/3/2013Q2 2013$2.58$2.73$5.29 billion$5.47 billionViewN/A1/8/2013Q1 2013$0.37$0.62$2.64 billion$2.93 billionViewListen10/3/2012Q412($0.43)($0.44)$2.25 billion$2.11 billionViewN/A6/27/2012$1.58$1.63ViewN/A4/4/2012$2.11$2.28ViewN/A1/5/2012$0.17$0.23ViewN/A10/5/2011($0.27)($0.22)ViewN/A4/6/2011$1.84$1.87ViewN/A1/6/2011$0.01$0.02ViewN/A(Data available from 1/1/2011 forward)


Estimates
Earnings Estimates for Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON)2017 EPS Consensus Estimate: $5.75QuarterNumber of EstimatesLow EstimateHigh EstimateAverage EstimateQ1 20172$0.04$3.57$1.81Q2 20172$2.57$2.63$2.60Q3 20171$1.77$1.77$1.77Q4 20171($0.43)($0.43)($0.43)(Data provided by Zacks Investment Research)


Dividends
Current Dividend Information for Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON)Next Dividend:7/28/2017Annual Dividend:$2.16Dividend Yield:1.84%Dividend Growth:11.60% (3 Year Average)Payout Ratio:46.75% (Trailing 12 Months of Earnings)  43.64% (Based on This Year's Estimates)39.85% (Based on Next Year's Estimates)Track Record:7 Years of Consecutive Dividend GrowthDividend History by Quarter for Monsanto Company (NYSE MON)AnnouncedPeriodAmountYieldEx-Dividend DateRecord DatePayable Date6/6/2017quarterly$0.541.83%7/5/20177/7/20177/28/20171/27/2017quarterly$0.541.99%4/5/20174/7/20174/28/201712/6/2016quarterly$0.542.04%1/4/20171/6/20171/27/20178/12/2016quarterly$0.542.06%10/5/201610/7/201610/28/20166/9/2016quarterly$0.541.98%7/6/20167/8/20167/29/20161/29/2016quarterly$0.542.4%4/6/20164/8/20164/29/201612/7/2015quarterly$0.542.23%1/6/20161/8/20161/29/20168/4/2015quarterly$0.542.1%10/7/201510/9/201510/30/20156/8/2015quarterly$0.491.72%6/30/20157/2/20157/24/20152/2/2015quarterly$0.491.65%3/31/20154/2/20154/24/201512/8/2014quarterly$0.491.63%1/7/20151/9/20151/30/20158/5/2014quarterly$0.491.69%10/8/201410/10/201410/31/20146/6/2014quarterly$0.431.42%7/1/20147/3/20147/25/20141/28/2014quarterly$0.431.61%4/2/20144/4/20144/25/201412/9/2013quarterly$0.431.54%1/8/20141/10/20141/31/20148/6/2013quarterly$0.431.81%10/2/201310/4/201310/25/20136/6/2013quarterly$0.381.48%7/2/20137/5/20137/26/20131/31/2013quarterly$0.381.47%4/3/20134/5/20134/26/2013(Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Insider Trades
Insider Trading and Institutional Ownership History for Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON)Insider Ownership Percentage: 0.79%Institutional Ownership Percentage: 74.96%Insider Trades by Quarter for Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON)Transaction DateInsider NameTitleBuy/SellNumber of SharesAverage Share PriceTotal TransactionDetails7/10/2017Robert T. FraleyEVPSell52,410$117.95$6,181,759.50  7/3/2017Steven MizellEVPSell11,300$118.57$1,339,841.00  6/13/2017Janet M HollowaySVPSell7,423$118.00$875,914.00  6/2/2017Janet M HollowaySVPSell3,337$118.00$393,766.00  5/3/2017Kerry J PreeteEVPSell11,346$116.86$1,325,893.56  4/17/2017Brett D BegemannCOOSell80,940$116.13$9,399,562.20  4/10/2017Hugh GrantCEOSell149,230$116.15$17,333,064.50  4/10/2017Steven MizellEVPSell13,700$116.11$1,590,707.00  1/25/2017Michael K SternCEOSell5,670$110.00$623,700.00  1/10/2017Steven MizellEVPSell2,525$108.56$274,114.00  11/17/2016Kerry J. PreeteEVPSell2,745$100.96$277,135.20  10/14/2016Robert T FraleyEVPSell80,631$102.04$8,227,587.24  10/10/2016Charles S McmillanDirectorBuy3,500$103.23$361,305.00  10/10/2016Steven MizellEVPSell310$103.09$31,957.90  7/14/2016Brett D BegemannCOOSell27,980$103.62$2,899,287.60  7/13/2016Michael K SternCEOSell12,797$101.77$1,302,350.69  4/19/2016George PosteDirectorSell1,136$91.93$104,432.48  4/14/2016Steven MizellEVPSell9,500$89.06$846,070.00  4/12/2016Charles S McmillanDirectorBuy3,500$87.25$305,375.00  4/12/2016Michael J FrankVPSell2,000$87.49$174,980.00  4/11/2016Steven MizellEVPSell3,900$86.87$338,793.00  11/17/2015Kerry J. PreeteEVPSell4,667$95.62$446,258.54  10/21/2015William U ParfetDirectorSell17,000$91.16$1,549,720.00  10/13/2015Steven MizellVPSell6,100$89.40$545,340.00  4/15/2015Kerry J PreeteEVPSell27,580$119.37$3,292,224.60  4/8/2015Tom D HartleyVPSell4,600$117.91$542,386.00  2/13/2015Michael K SternCOOSell1,391$125.00$173,875.00  1/20/2015David F SnivelyEVPSell29,521$117.14$3,458,089.94  1/12/2015Steven MizellVPSell20,500$118.72$2,433,760.00  11/17/2014Nicole M RingenbergVPSell12,780$118.83$1,518,647.40  10/15/2014Robert T FraleyEVPSell10,679$107.93$1,152,584.47  10/14/2014Nicole M RingenbergVPSell2,500$108.01$270,025.00  10/13/2014Steven MizellVPSell3,480$106.08$369,158.40  9/3/2014Kerry J PreeteEVPSell3,827$115.50$442,018.50  7/8/2014Michael J FrankVPSell7,500$124.53$933,975.00  7/7/2014Robert T FraleyEVPSell54,740$125.32$6,860,016.80  7/3/2014David F SnivelyEVPSell35,220$126.25$4,446,525.00  7/3/2014William U ParfetDirectorSell23,800$126.52$3,011,176.00  5/23/2014Janet M HollowaySVPSell21,280$120.00$2,553,600.00  5/7/2014Kerry PreeteEVPSell49,850$115.00$5,732,750.00  4/15/2014Hugh GrantCEOSell95,000$110.33$10,481,350.00  4/15/2014Tom HartleyVPSell7,900$110.51$873,029.00  1/17/2014Hugh GrantCEOSell44,179$112.69$4,978,531.51  1/16/2014Robert FraleyEVPSell64,850$112.57$7,300,164.50  1/14/2014Steven MizellVPSell24,000$112.05$2,689,200.00  11/11/2013Nicole RingenbergVPSell13,560$107.04$1,451,462.40  10/15/2013Tom HartleyVPSell5,860$105.70$619,402.00  10/8/2013Steven MizellVPSell11,370$104.50$1,188,165.00  10/7/2013Nicole RingenbergVPSell3,500$105.02$367,570.00  9/4/2013Kerry PreeteEVPSell5,276$99.00$522,324.00  7/19/2013Gerald A SteinerEVPSell12,293$104.00$1,278,472.00  7/9/2013Tom D HartleyVPSell6,000$100.15$600,900.00  7/8/2013Janet M HollowaySVPSell10,700$98.80$1,057,160.00  7/3/2013Hugh GrantCEOSell40,000$97.74$3,909,600.00  7/2/2013Steven MizellVPSell37,000$97.71$3,615,270.00  5/13/2013David F SnivelyEVPSell106,366$107.24$11,406,689.84  5/1/2013Pierre CourdurouxCFOSell5,720$105.47$603,288.40  (Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Headlines
Headline Trends for Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON)


Latest Headlines for Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON)


Source:


All Sources
Trusted Sources
MarketBeat.com
Bloomberg
MarketWatch
Motley Fool
NASDAQ
Reuters
Seeking Alpha
The Street
The Wall Street Journal
Yahoo Finance




DateHeadlineAGCO to buy Precision Planting equipment business from Monsantoseekingalpha.com - July 26 at 2:36 PMMonsanto Company (MON) Receives Average Recommendation of "Hold" from Analystswww.americanbankingnews.com - July 25 at 9:32 AMETFs with exposure to Monsanto Co. : July 24, 2017finance.yahoo.com - July 24 at 7:14 PMCampaign group Avaaz calls on EU to block Bayer's Monsanto deal - Reuterswww.reuters.com - July 24 at 2:11 PMMonsanto Co. breached its 50 day moving average in a Bullish Manner : MON-US : July 24, 2017finance.yahoo.com - July 24 at 2:10 PMComparing Monsanto (MON) & Potash Corporation of Saskatchewan (POT)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 24 at 9:25 AMBayer, Monsanto deal faces EU test next weekwww.bizjournals.com - July 22 at 6:34 AMBayer Faces EU Test in Race to Close Monsanto Deal by Year-Endfinance.yahoo.com - July 21 at 2:33 AMParker Waichman comments on Monsanto Pesticides Restricted Use in Tennesseewww.bizjournals.com - July 20 at 1:21 AMWeed killer turns neighbor against neighbor in farm countrymarketbeat.com - July 17 at 1:09 PMMonsanto Company (MON) Lowered to Sell at BidaskClubwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 16 at 11:26 PMETFs with exposure to Monsanto Co. : July 14, 2017finance.yahoo.com - July 16 at 1:05 PMZacks: Brokerages Anticipate Monsanto Company (MON) Will Post Quarterly Sales of $2.46 Billionwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 16 at 8:08 AMTennessee restricts use of Monsanto pesticide as problems spread - Reuterswww.reuters.com - July 15 at 6:34 AMUnusual signs that mean a stock's ready to explodefinance.yahoo.com - July 15 at 6:34 AM-$0.35 EPS Expected for Monsanto Company (MON) This Quarterwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 14 at 6:26 PMQ4 2017 Earnings Forecast for Monsanto Company Issued By Jefferies Group (NYSE:MON)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 14 at 12:29 PMMonsanto Co. breached its 50 day moving average in a Bearish Manner : MON-US : July 13, 2017finance.yahoo.com - July 14 at 6:34 AMTennessee restricts use of Monsanto pesticide as problems spreadfinance.yahoo.com - July 14 at 6:34 AMDoes the World’s Top Weed Killer Cause Cancer?finance.yahoo.com - July 13 at 6:56 AMDoes the World’s Top Weed Killer Cause Cancer? Trump’s EPA Will Decidefinance.yahoo.com - July 13 at 6:56 AMMonsanto Company 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call Slidesseekingalpha.com - July 12 at 4:11 AMArkansas Bans Crop-Damaging Chemical: How Big Of An Herbicide Market Is Lost?finance.yahoo.com - July 12 at 4:11 AMRobert T. Fraley Sells 52,410 Shares of Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON) Stockwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 11 at 7:52 PMThe Impact Of Glysophate Regulation And Litigation On Monsantoseekingalpha.com - July 11 at 2:15 AMCitigroup Inc. Reiterates "Neutral" Rating for Monsanto Company (NYSE:MON)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 10 at 3:46 PMTwo states ban dicamba weed killer after drift complaintsfinance.yahoo.com - July 8 at 12:41 PMMonsanto Company (MON) Upgraded to Buy by Vetr Inc.www.americanbankingnews.com - July 7 at 12:38 AMInsider Selling: Monsanto Company (MON) EVP Sells 11,300 Shares of Stockwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 6 at 7:24 PMMonsanto Company (MON) Ex-Dividend Date Scheduled for July 05, 2017 - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - July 5 at 8:35 AMETFs with exposure to Monsanto Co. : July 4, 2017finance.yahoo.com - July 5 at 8:35 AMEarnings Review and Free Research Report: Monsanto's EPS Grew 17%; Sales up 1%finance.yahoo.com - July 5 at 8:35 AMMonsanto Company Sees Unusually High Options Volume (NYSE:MON)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 5 at 7:24 AMMonsanto Company Sees Unusually Large Options Volume (MON)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 5 at 7:24 AMMonsanto Company (NYSE:MON) Lowered to Hold at Zacks Investment Researchwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 4 at 10:04 AMMonsanto Co. :MON-US: Earnings Analysis: Q3, 2017 By the Numbers : July 3, 2017finance.yahoo.com - July 3 at 9:25 PMMonsanto’s Corn Seed and Traits Will Drive Its Profitfinance.yahoo.com - July 1 at 2:27 AMMonsanto Company (MON) Given Consensus Rating of "Buy" by Analystswww.americanbankingnews.com - June 30 at 10:10 AMMonsanto profit tops expectations as soybean sales surge - Reuterswww.reuters.com - June 30 at 1:43 AMAnalyzing Monsanto’s Gross Margins in 3Q17finance.yahoo.com - June 30 at 1:43 AMMonsanto Company (MON) Lifted to Hold at BidaskClubwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 29 at 7:20 PMBarclays PLC Boosts Monsanto Company (MON) Price Target to $120.00www.americanbankingnews.com - June 29 at 12:49 PMRoyal Bank Of Canada Increases Monsanto Company (MON) Price Target to $128.00www.americanbankingnews.com - June 29 at 8:16 AMCalifornia says key ingredient in Roundup weed killer can cause cancer - CNNwww.cnn.com - June 29 at 4:52 AMSoybean demand propels Monsanto to an earnings beat - Business Insiderwww.businessinsider.com - June 29 at 4:52 AM[$$] Monsanto Results Boosted by Soybean Seeds and Traits Businessfinance.yahoo.com - June 29 at 4:52 AMMonsanto Company (MON) Releases Quarterly  Earnings Results, Beats Expectations By $0.19 EPSwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 28 at 2:14 PMSoybean Gains Lift Monsanto Sales, Profitwww.fool.com - June 28 at 11:05 AMSoybean Gains Lift Monsanto Sales, Profit - Motley Foolwww.fool.com - June 28 at 10:27 AMMonsanto Company Delivers Solid Third Quarter as It Looks to ... - Business Wire (press release)www.businesswire.com - June 28 at 10:26 AM


Social





Chart
Monsanto Company (MON) Chart for Friday, July, 28, 2017




This page was last updated on 7/28/2017 by MarketBeat.com Staff





























































BNB Daily












 
















 








Retirement Planning Should Factor in Your Age
Aug 20th, 2016
Retirement planning is a lot like politics. Not only does everybody have an opinion, but they may also believe that everybody else’s opinion is either flat-out wrong or based on ulterior,...  






Is Health Care Too Expensive for Retirees?

Aug 17th, 2016 

New research from Fidelity warns that retirement isn’t all that was once...  






Will Raising Minimum Social Security Age Benefit Everyone Equally?

Aug 15th, 2016 

The Social Security system in the United States is supposed to help establish...  






People With Bad Credit Are Using More Credit Than People With Good Credit

Aug 11th, 2016 

It seemed that America’s romance with credit was on its way out. Of course,...  






Could Criminal Probe Spell the End of Valeant Pharmaceuticals? (NYSE: VRX)

Aug 11th, 2016 

Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc (NYSE: VRX) is currently under investigation over...  





Baseball News
Game Lines for MLB 2017 Ever Changing

Jun 30th, 2017 





We are now around four months into the 2017 season of Major League Baseball, with the regular season due to come to a conclusion at the beginning of October. Last season’s World Series winners...  
More »

Giants Matt Moore Loses No-Hitter in the Ninth Inning
Tim Tebow Sets His Focus On Baseball, Really?
Yankees Acquire Tyler Clippard, Trade Andrew Miller, Continue “Reloading”
Nationals Complete Trade For Pirates Closer Mark Melancon
Toronto Blue Jays Set to Acquire Melvin Upton Jr. From Padres
MLB Trade Deadline: 3B Trade Market, 3 Teams Who Can Benefit
Chris Sale Suspended, Meltdown Could be Final Indication of a Trade out of Chicago
Aroldis Chapman Could Be Traded Any Moment, National League Landscape Could Change Immediately



Business
Hasbro Says Numbers High and Expect More From Hollywood-Licensed Properties In the Future (HAS)

Feb 7th, 2017 





Toy company Hasbro (NASDAQ: HAS) has just reported its Q4 EPS is $1.53, which is impressively $0.25 higher than the previous analyst estimate of $1.27. In addition, quarter for the revenue registered...  
More »

Dollar General Plans to Add 10,000 Jobs This Year (DG)
Brookfield Infrastructure Partners LP (BIP) Stock Trending Up After Price Target Increase at Barclays PLC
Bottomline Technologies, Inc. (EPAY) Stock Price Target Moved to $31.00 at Needham & Company LLC
Baxter International Inc. (BAX) Stock Price Target Moved to $60.00 at Barclays PLC
Anthem, Inc. (ANTM) Stock Down After Price Target Increase at RBC Capital Markets
Anadarko Petroleum Corporation (APC) Stock Down After Price Target Increase at Barclays PLC
Wesco Aircraft Holdings, Inc. (WAIR) shares fall following downgrade at Zacks Investment Research
WEC Energy Group, Inc. (WEC) Stock Moves Down and Here’s Why



Pitching
New York Yankees Trade Rumors and Options (Starting Pitching Edition)

May 17th, 2016 





The New York Yankees have played better of late, but still face a very realistic possibility of becoming trade deadline sellers this summer. New York has until the end of July to figure out its...  
More »

Aroldis Chapman Debuted With a 100 MPH Fastball, Yankees Win
Demoting Luis Severino Will Not Solve Anything for the Yankees
Yankees Starters Beginning to Rise to the Occasion
Yankees’ Players Passing All the Early Tests (Pitching Edition)
Yankees Knew Exactly What They Were Doing When They Signed Aroldis Chapman
Aroldis Chapman Suspended 30 games by MLB
Best and Worse Case Scenarios for the Yankees and Aroldis Chapman
Yankees and Royals And Why Aroldis Chapman Closes the Gap





News
New York Yankees Do Nothing And It’s the Best Thing Going For Them

Jun 29th, 2016 





As a life-long Yankees’ fan I would be beyond angry if the New York Yankees were underachieving en route to a 37-37 record and fourth place in late June. We’ve seen the script before,...  
More »

If the Yankees Have a Firesale, Expect These Players to Get Called Up
Brian Cashman Doesn’t Need Another Month, Yankees are Sellers Now
New York Yankees Trade Rumors, Options (Prospect Edition)
New York Yankees Trade Rumors, Options (Bench Edition)
Aaron Judge Position Changes Could Imply Something Brewing in the New York Yankees Outfield
New York Yankees Trade Rumors (Infield Edition)
New York Yankees Trade Rumors and Options (Starting Pitching Edition)
New York Yankees Trade Rumors and Options (Bullpen Edition)



Trade Rumors
American League Teams That Need the Most Help at the MLB Trade Deadline

Jul 21st, 2016 





Baseball is a funny sport in that at any given time, someone like Clayton Kershaw or Matt Harvey or Yan Gomes can go down with injury and change the entire complexion of the season. For teams...  
More »

New York Yankees Do Nothing And It’s the Best Thing Going For Them
If the Yankees Have a Firesale, Expect These Players to Get Called Up
Brian Cashman Doesn’t Need Another Month, Yankees are Sellers Now
New York Yankees Trade Rumors, Options (Prospect Edition)
New York Yankees Trade Rumors, Options (Bench Edition)
New York Yankees Trade Rumors (Infield Edition)
New York Yankees Trade Rumors and Options (Outfield Edition)
New York Yankees Trade Rumors and Options (Starting Pitching Edition)



Prospects
Aaron Judge Position Changes Could Imply Something Brewing in the New York Yankees Outfield

May 25th, 2016 





Something fairly innocent came out of Pinstripe Alley a few days ago, but it could mean big things for Yankees’ top prospect, Aaron Judge, and the current major league outfield as presently...  
More »

Jorge Mateo is Turning Heads, Comparable to a Top MLB Prospect
Ben Gamel Collects First Major League Hit, Updates on the Best of the Rest in the Yankees’ Farm System
Alex Rodriguez’s Injury Could be a Blessing in Disguise for Yankees
Ben Gamel Promoted, Brett Gardner Potentially Headed to Extended Absense
Aaron Judge, James Kaprielian Stand out Early for Yankees, Mixed Results for the Other Big Prospects
Aaron Judge, Comparing Top Yankees Prospect to Other Players of his Stature
New York Yankees Individual Goals Could Make or Break the Season
Yankees’ Prospect, Greg Bird, to Miss 2016 Season With Torn Labrum

















Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Close Brothers Group plc (LON:CBG) PT Raised to GBX 1,535 at Liberum Capital
Bovis Homes Group plc (LON:BVS) Price Target Raised to GBX 833 at Barclays PLC
LyondellBasell Industries NV (LYB) Receives $93.63 Average Price Target from Analysts
Fomento Economico Mexicano S.A.B. de C.V. (NYSE:FMX) Receives $92.00 Average PT from Brokerages
J D Wetherspoon PLC (NASDAQ:JDWPY) Downgraded by Zacks Investment Research
Analysts Set Fox Factory Holding Corp. (NASDAQ:FOXF) Price Target at $28.60
Ingles Markets, Incorporated (NASDAQ:IMKTA) Upgraded at Zacks Investment Research
Lantheus Holdings, Inc. (NASDAQ:LNTH) Downgraded by Zacks Investment Research
Liberty Broadband Corporation (NASDAQ:LBRDK) Raised to “Hold” at Zacks Investment Research
Brokerages Anticipate Advanced Disposal Services Inc (NASDAQ:ADSW) Will Post Earnings of $0.17 Per Share
Nomura Holdings Inc ADR (NYSE:NMR) Given Average Rating of “Hold” by Analysts
Critical Contrast: Aercap Holdings N.V. (NYSE:AER) versus Avolon Holdings (AVOL)
Ryerson Holding Corporation (RYI) versus Reliance Steel & Aluminum Co. (NYSE:RS) Critical Analysis
Colfax Corporation (CFX) Stock Rating Lowered by Zacks Investment Research
Air Canada (AC) Price Target Raised to C$20.50
Boston Beer Company, Inc. (The) (SAM) Stock Rating Upgraded by Zacks Investment Research
Scotiabank Cuts Ritchie Bros. Auctioneers Inc (RBA) Price Target to C$41.00
Stock Traders Buy High Volume of Call Options on Western Digital Corporation (WDC)
Investors Purchase High Volume of Put Options on SPDR S&P Oil & Gas Explore & Prod. (NYSE:XOP)
Q2 2017 EPS Estimates for CyrusOne Inc Increased by Analyst (NASDAQ:CONE)


 





















	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started









































Enhance Product Development | Invention Design & Licensing



































 








877.993.6426
support@enhancepd.com
 

 
 
 









Select Page


  
 
 







You've Got The Idea...
Team up with Enhance to bring your invention to life and get it to market!


 



Have a New Invention Idea?
 




If you have an invention idea or new product, we want to hear from you. At Enhance Product Development, we help inventors develop and launch their new invention ideas. Simply put, “We turn ideas into REALITY.”
So if you are an entrepreneur who has been working on a new invention for years or if you’re an inventor who just came up with a new idea for a product, we can help!
 
 

Request FREE Inventor Information
100% Confidential. No Obligation Consultation.
How to Reach Me 

 
 


If you are a human and are seeing this field, please leave it blank.			



































Best Describes Me 				
 -Please Select-
Inventor aspiring for a royalty or license deal.
Entrepreneur seeking to bring new product to market.
Company wanting to add to existing product line.






























If you are a human and are seeing this field, please leave it blank. 				



















All information remains confidential.  Must be 18 years or older.
 
 
 
 




Experience the Enhance Difference
 
 
 




Timely Support
There’s no maze or dialing tree, call us and reach a live person.
 
 
 



Advanced Technology
From the CAD software to the 3D printer in our office, we are cutting edge.
 
 
 



Innovative Ideas
As a smaller design firm, our culture embodies “out of the box” thinking.
 
 
 
 


%
Industrial Design

 

%
Engineering & Prototyping

 

%
Licensing

 

%
Marketing

 
 
 



Retail Partners
Our products have sold or are currently selling in
 
 
 


 

 

 

 
 
 




What Enhance Clients Are Saying
 
 
 



I am almost at a loss for words… Everything from the consultation to the sketches was terrific. Words can’t explain how impressed I was with the effort and how everything was completed in a timely manner.
Theodis H.
Honolulu, HI
 
 
 






Get Started Today!

Fill Out The Form Above

 


The 3D renderings, logo and sell sheet were awesome! I was very pleased with the feedback that was provided along the way and I’m extremely pleased on how quick my drawings came alive for me.
Joe K.
Dubuque, IA
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 































Invention Marketing & Licensing Help For Patents and New Product Ideas







































 
 






651.552.0080
info@lambertinvent.com



Facebook




Twitter




RSS


  





Facebook




Twitter




RSS



  
 
 









Select Page


  
 
 










Does Your Invention Need a Boost?
 We are a premier invention marketing and licensing firm that represents inventors on contingency. 
Learn More
 
 
 




Launching Inventions

Our one goal is to get your new invention on the market and earn you royalties.  Learn more about some of our successfully licensed inventions.

View Invention Successes
 
 
 



Ready for your Invention to Soar?
 For your invention to take off, you need to take the first step. 
Submit Your Invention
 
 
 
 
 
 



Need Help With Your Invention or Product Idea?
If you are an inventor with a patent or just someone who has one great idea for a new invention, we can help you make it very profitable.
We are licensing agents in search of great inventions, both with patents and without patents, to bring to market by way of a licensing agreement.
Simply put, we find companies who will manufacture and distribute your invention and give you a generous royalty percentage of sales.
Let Us Pay For It!
Besides a nominal small fee to evaluate your invention, which only serves to weed out those that are simply curious, we are only compensated when we license a deal for you.
Depending on how developed your invention is at the time you submit it, our services of marketing and licensing for your invention or patent can range but may include:
Invention Marketing and Licensing Services



•  Patent assistance
•  Market research
•  Prototype development
•  Engineered drawings
•  Computer renderings
•  Manufacturing feasibility
•  Invention marketing material creation
•  Networking with potential licensees
•  Trade show representation
•  Invention presentation
•  Licensing negotiation
•  License agreement administration



So, if your invention is great like you say it is, and we choose to represent you, all other costs for seeking a license deal will be paid by us!
There are no hidden charges, no large up-front fees, just a no-risk-high-reward offer that we are making to those with great inventions!
 
 



Invention Success Stories
Our one goal is to get your new invention on the market. Learn more about some of our successfully licensed products.
Learn More >
 
 

w
Contact Us
Have a question not covered on our website? We want to hear from you.
Contact L&L >
 
 


Submit Your Invention
There are three ways of submitting your new invention to our firm, please follow the directions or contact us.
Start Today >
 
 
 
 


Hear What Some Of Our Clients Are Saying…
 
 
 



				“Thank you for licensing my product twice! Your persistent, professional and SUCCESSFUL efforts to create royalty revenue are truly commendable.”
				Barry E.
Inventor of Powertach, Louisville, KY
 
 
 


				“After two other companies failed, Lambert & Lambert got my product on the market…Thank you L&L!”
				Arthur B.
Inventor of the Easy Carver, Miami, FL
 
 
 


				 “Working with Lambert & Lambert has been a pleasure.  They are true professionals.  I couldn’t have done it without them!” 
				Terry S.
Inventor of Instant Trainer, Boise, ID
 
 
 
 


Retail Partners
Our products have sold or are selling in:

 
 
 


 

 

 

 
 
 




Our Invention Services
				 Lambert & Lambert offers contingency based representation services for inventors and entrepreneurs.  With a long list of successfully launched products, we want yours to be next!



Learn More

 
 
 






About L&L
We are a professional license agency bringing new inventions to market.  We work with inventors just like you!
About Us >





 
 
 



License Your Invention
With increased pace of technology, companies are in need of new invention ideas more than ever. Learn how to capitalize.
Learn About Licensing > 





 
 
 


t
Have A Question?
Find the answers to common questions regarding our marketing and licensing services for your invention.
Get Answers >





 
 
 



Submit Your Invention
There are three ways of submitting your new invention to our firm, please follow the directions or contact us.
Start Today >





 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 









